Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2095
Receivership; acts not precluded; effect on liability.

Sections 71-2086 to 71-2094 shall not:

(1) Preclude the sale or lease of a health care facility as otherwise provided by law; or

(2) Affect the civil or criminal liability of the licensee, owner, or operator of the health care facility placed in receivership for any acts or omissions of the licensee, owner, or operator which occurred before the receiver was appointed.

Laws 1983, LB 274, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-6006;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 71.